District of Columbia statutes.
47-2885.03

General prohibitions.

(a)-(c)Repealed.

(d)

It shall be unlawful for any person to operate, maintain, open or establish a pharmacy within the District of Columbia without first having obtained a license or registration from the Mayor.

(e)

Repealed.

(f)

It shall be unlawful for any establishment or institution, or any part thereof, that does not provide services of the practice of pharmacy, as defined within this part, to use or have upon it, or displayed within it, or affixed to or used in connection with it, a sign bearing the word or words “pharmacy,” “apothecary,” “drugstore,” “druggist,” or any word or words of similar or like import which would tend to indicate that the practice of pharmacy is being conducted in the establishment or institution.

Sept. 16, 1980, D.C. Law 3-98, § 4, 27 DCR 3528
Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1102(b), 33 DCR 729
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190
1981 Ed., § 2-2003.
Section 302 of D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.
1981 Ed., §§ 2-2004, 2-2005.
Section 302 of D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.